Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Human Services shall, on or before the


effective date of this act, submit a request for a federal waiver to


the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition


Service to seek authorization to impose restrictions on the foods


eligible for purchase with Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program


(SNAP) benefits that are designed to improve the nutritional content


of SNAP-eligible foods and maximize program efficiency including,


but not limited to, restrictions based on food type, brand, volume,

Req. No. 2205 Page 1


and nutritional content. The Department may use guidelines of the


Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and


Children (WIC) in establishing the restrictions described in this


subsection. If the waiver request is denied, the Department shall


modify and resubmit the waiver request within sixty (60) days of


denial. The Department shall continue modifications and submissions


until the waiver request is approved.


B. The waiver request shall include:


1. A justification citing:


a. public health concerns,


b. SNAP’s statutory intent, and


c. cost savings to taxpayers;


2. An implementation plan ensuring that existing point-of-sale


systems used by retailers in this state have the ability to properly


enforce the restriction;


3. A strategy for education and outreach informing SNAP


recipients of alternative healthy food options; and


4. A reporting mechanism to track the impact of the waiver,


including spending patterns and health outcomes.


C. If the waiver is approved, the Department shall implement


the restriction within six (6) months of receiving federal


authorization.





Req. No. 2205 Page 2


D. The Department shall electronically submit an annual report


to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House


of Representatives, and the Governor that includes:


1. The status of the waiver request;


2. Data on SNAP spending patterns in this state; and


3. Any identified challenges or recommendations for further


policy action.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective September 1, 2026.




60-2-2205 DC 12/23/2025 3:58:26 PM





























Req. No. 2205 Page 3